nb: Radius av hulrom: 1/2 tommer; 11/16 tommer; 3/4 tommer; 3/8 tommer; 5/16 tommer; 5/8 tommer; 7/16 tommer; 9/16 tommer; Flat; Annet
nl: Holslijp radius: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Plat; Overig
zh-TW: 中空半徑: 1/2 吋; 11/16 吋; 3/4 吋; 3/8 吋; 5/16 吋; 5/8 吋; 7/16 吋; 9/16 吋; 平坦; 其他
ko: 할로우 반지름: 1/2인치; 11/16인치; 3/4인치; 3/8인치; 5/16인치; 5/8인치; 7/16인치; 9/16인치; 플랫; 기타
da: Radius af hulrum: 1/2 tomme; 11/16 tomme; 3/4 tomme; 3/8 tomme; 5/16 tomme; 5/8 tomme; 7/16 tomme; 9/16 tomme; Flad; Andet
en: Radius of hollow: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Flat; Other
sv: Skålradie: 1/2 tum; 11/16 tum; 3/4 tum; 3/8 tum; 5/16 tum; 5/8 tum; 7/16 tum; 9/16 tum; Plan; Övrigt
hr-HR: Polumjer šupljine: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Ravno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Радиус на вдлъбнатината: 1/2 инча; 11/16 инча; 3/4 инча; 3/8 инча; 5/16 инча; 5/8 инча; 7/16 инча; 9/16 инча; Плосък; Други
cs: Poloměr dutiny: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Plochý; Ostatní
ja: くぼみ半径: 1/2インチ; 11/16インチ; 3/4インチ; 3/8インチ; 5/16インチ; 5/8インチ; 7/16インチ; 9/16インチ; フラット; その他
pt-BR: Raio de hollow: 1/2 pol.; 11/16 pol.; 3/4 pol.; 3/8 pol.; 5/16 pol.; 5/8 pol.; 7/16 pol.; 9/16 pol.; Plano; Outros
fr: Rayon du creux: 1/2 po; 11/16 po; 3/4 po; 3/8 po; 5/16 po; 5/8 po; 7/16 po; 9/16 po; Plat; Autre
fi: Terän uran säde: 1/2 tuumaa; 11/16 tuumaa; 3/4 tuumaa; 3/8 tuumaa; 5/16 tuumaa; 5/8 tuumaa; 7/16 tuumaa; 9/16 tuumaa; Litteä; Muu
it: Raggio della cavità: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Piatto; Altro
pl: Promień wydrążenia: 1/2 cala; 11/16 cala; 3/4 cala; 3/8 cala; 5/16 cala; 5/8 cala; 7/16 cala; 9/16 cala; Płaski; Inne
de: Radius der Hohlkehle: 1/2 Zoll; 11/16 Zoll; 3/4 Zoll; 3/8 Zoll; 5/16 Zoll; 5/8 Zoll; 7/16 Zoll; 9/16 Zoll; Flach; Sonstige
tr: Oyuğun yarıçapı: 1/2 inç; 11/16 inç; 3/4 inç; 3/8 inç; 5/16 inç; 5/8 inç; 7/16 inç; 9/16 inç; Düz; Diğer
zh-CN: 冰刀凹槽半径: 1/2 英寸; 11/16 英寸; 3/4 英寸; 3/8 英寸; 5/16 英寸; 5/8 英寸; 7/16 英寸; 9/16 英寸; 平刃; 其他
el: Ακτίνα κοιλότητας: 1/2 ίντσα; 11/16 ίντσα; 3/4 ίντσα; 3/8 ίντσα; 5/16 ίντσα; 5/8 ίντσα; 7/16 ίντσα; 9/16 ίντσα; Επίπεδο; Άλλο
vi: Bán kính của lỗ rỗng: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Phẳng; Khác
sk-SK: Polomer jamky: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Plochý; Iné
lt-LT: Griovelio spindulys: 1/2 col.; 11/16 col.; 3/4 col.; 3/8 col.; 5/16 col.; 5/8 col.; 7/16 col.; 9/16 col.; Plokščias; Kita
es: Radio del hueco del filo: 1/2 pulg.; 11/16 pulg.; 3/4 pulg.; 3/8 pulg.; 5/16 pulg.; 5/8 pulg.; 7/16 pulg.; 9/16 pulg.; Plano; Otro
sl-SI: Polmer utora: 1/2 in; 11/16 in; 3/4 in; 3/8 in; 5/16 in; 5/8 in; 7/16 in; 9/16 in; Ploska; Drugo
th: รัศมีของโพรง: 1/2 นิ้ว; 11/16 นิ้ว; 3/4 นิ้ว; 3/8 นิ้ว; 5/16 นิ้ว; 5/8 นิ้ว; 7/16 นิ้ว; 9/16 นิ้ว; แบน; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Raio do recuo: 1/2 pol.; 11/16 pol.; 3/4 pol.; 3/8 pol.; 5/16 pol.; 5/8 pol.; 7/16 pol.; 9/16 pol.; Plano; Outro
ro-RO: Raza golului: 1/2 inchi; 11/16 inchi; 3/4 inchi; 3/8 inchi; 5/16 inchi; 5/8 inchi; 7/16 inchi; 9/16 inchi; Plat; Altele
ru: Радиус желоба: 1/2 дюйма; 11/16 дюйма; 3/4 дюйма; 3/8 дюйма; 5/16 дюйма; 5/8 дюйма; 7/16 дюйма; 9/16 дюйма; Плоский; Другое
hu: Homorulat: 1/2 hüvelyk; 11/16 hüvelyk; 3/4 hüvelyk; 3/8 hüvelyk; 5/16 hüvelyk; 5/8 hüvelyk; 7/16 hüvelyk; 9/16 hüvelyk; Lapos; Egyéb